Connecticut, session 2026, HB05035.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 10-233j of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2027):
[(a) No student in a public school in the state shall possess or use a
remotely activated paging device unless such student obtains the
written permission of the school principal for such possession and use.
The principal shall grant such permission only if the student or his
parent or guardian establishes to the satisfaction of the principal that a
reasonable basis exists for the possession and use of the device.
(b) A local or regional board of education may restrict the student
possession or use of cellular mobile telephones in the schools under its
jurisdiction. In determining whether to restrict such possession or use,
the local or regional board of education shall consider the special needs
sHB5035 / File No. 726


sHB5035 File No. 726
of parents and students.]
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Wireless communication device" means any portable wireless
device that has the capability to provide voice, messaging or other data
communication between two or more parties, including, but not limited
to, a (A) cellular mobile telephone, (B) tablet computer, (C) computer or
laptop computer, (D) gaming device, or (E) smart watch;
(2) "Personal wireless communication device" means a wireless
communication device that is owned by or otherwise under the control
of a student or parent or guardian of a student and has not been issued
to such student or another student by the local or regional board of
education;
(3) "Access" means holding, viewing, wearing or otherwise using a
wireless communication device for the purpose of communication,
accessing the Internet, gaming or any other function commonly
associated with a wireless communication device;
(4) "Student" means a child enrolled in (A) a preschool program
operated by a local or regional board of education, or (B) grade
kindergarten to twelve, inclusive, in a public school in this state; and
(5) "Social media" has the same meaning as provided in section 10-
231c.
(b) (1) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (2) of this
subsection, no student shall be permitted to access or use such student's
personal wireless communication device on school grounds during the
regular school day. All such personal wireless communication devices
shall be powered off and stored in a manner prescribed by the policy
adopted by the local or regional board of education pursuant to
subsection (d) of this section.
(2) A student may access and use a personal wireless communication
device on school grounds during the regular school day if (A) such use
sHB5035 / File No. 726


sHB5035 File No. 726
or access is required under such student's individualized education
program, in accordance with the Individuals with Disabilities Education
Improvement Act of 2004 and sections 10-76a to 10-76ooo, inclusive, or
is necessary to implement the provisions of an accommodations plan for
such student pursuant to Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973,
as amended from time to time, for such student, (B) a licensed physician,
physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse determines
that such use or access is necessary for the health and well-being of such
student, or (C) such use or access is limited to a computer, laptop
computer or tablet computer for instructional purposes only and
authorized under the policy adopted by the local or regional board of
education pursuant to subsection (d) of this section.
(c) No student may access any social media platforms through the use
of the Internet provided by the school during the school day, except
such access to a social media platform may be permitted when such
access is for instructional purposes.
(d) Each local and regional board of education shall adopt, and
update as necessary, a policy restricting the student access or use of
personal wireless communication devices during the regular school
day. A board shall consider the unique needs of teachers,
administrators, parents and guardians and students in the school
district. Such policy shall include, but need not be limited to, (1) a
prohibition on the access or use of personal wireless communication
devices by students on school grounds during the regular school day,
(2) provisions permitting the student access or use of personal wireless
communication devices during the regular school day in accordance
with the provisions of subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of this section,
(3) provisions regarding the storage of personal wireless
communication devices during the regular school day, including, but
not limited to, in a student's locker or in a specified location, (4) a system
of enforcement and discipline for violating the provisions of this section
or such policy, and (5) procedures for communicating between boards
of education and parents and guardians of students in the event of an
emergency that occurs during the regular school day.
sHB5035 / File No. 726


sHB5035 File No. 726
(e) Each local and regional board of education shall annually notify
the parents and guardians of students regarding the policy adopted
pursuant to subsection (d) of this section and include such policy in the
student handbooks for the school district.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) No local or regional board of
education may use social media as the exclusive means of directly
communicating with, or otherwise providing notice or information to,
students and the parents and guardians of students enrolled in a school
under the jurisdiction of the board. As used in this section, "social
media" has the same meaning as provided in section 10-231c of the
general statutes.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2027 10-233j
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 New section
sHB5035 / File No. 726


sHB5035 File No. 726
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill has no fiscal impact. It requires local and regional boards of
education (BOEs) to develop policies to ensure student use of cell
phones, other mobile devices, and social media is restricted during the
regular school day except in certain circumstances. It is anticipated that
BOEs can meet the requirements of the bill with existing resources.
House "A" eliminates the original bill and its associated fiscal impact,
and results in the impact described above.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
sHB5035 / File No. 726


sHB5035 File No. 726
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5035 (as amended by House "A")*
AN ACT REQUIRING SCHOOL DISTRICTS TO BAN CELLULAR
PHONES IN THE CLASSROOM.